Illinois, session 104th, HB3664.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Waterway Ports Commission Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1816/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Waterway Ports Commission Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-214, eff. 6-30-23.)